Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3240
Districts; certain activities; laws, rules, and regulations applicable.

In matters pertaining to applications for appropriation and use of surface water, construction of dams, drainage and channel rectification projects, and installation of ground water wells, districts shall comply with Chapter 46, articles 2, 6, and 7, and the applicable rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 40, p. 126;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 57;

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 5.